California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) Any market milk, market skim milk, or market cream that is used in any other milk product, or products resembling milk products, in which the use of market milk, or any components or derivatives of market milk, is required by, or pursuant to, this code, except any product defined in Section 61933 as class 2.

(c) Any market milk, market skim milk, market cream, market milk fat, or market milk solids-not-fat that is used in the standardizing or fortifying of any milk product that is defined in this section as class 1.

(d) Any market milk, market skim milk, or market cream that is used in any product not otherwise classified, which is required by any regulations adopted by the director pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 36631) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 15 to be made from market milk or any components or derivatives of market milk.

(e) Any market milk, market skim milk, market cream, market milk fat, or market milk solids-not-fat used in any filled product or imitation milk product, when the product imitated or resembled, is defined in this section as class 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 36, Sec. 6.   Effective June 22, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

61933.

Class 2 comprises any market milk, market skim milk, or market cream used in the manufacture of market cream, homogenized market cream, sour cream, sour cream dressing, sour half-and-half or light sour cream, uncreamed, creamed, or partially creamed cottage cheese, soft fresh cheese (fromage frais), buttermilk, kefir, and yogurt. Class 2 also comprises any market milk, market skim milk, or market cream used in the manufacture of any product for which a definition and standard is prescribed in Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501), except any product that is included in class 1, class 3, class 4a, or class 4b.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 323, Sec. 4.   (AB 2682)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

61934.

Class 3 comprises all market milk, market skim milk, or market cream used in the manufacture of frozen dairy products.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61935.

(a) Class 4a comprises all market milk, market skim milk, or market cream used in the manufacture of butter, dried milk, dried skim milk, nonfat dry milk solids, defatted milk solids, dried buttermilk, and all market milk, market skim milk, or market cream which is supplied to consumers as condensed milk, condensed skim milk, evaporated skim milk, evaporated cream or clotted cream, or evaporated milk, and any milk products which are UHT products, as defined in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 39701) of Part 3 of Division 15, or ultrapasteurized, and sold for use outside of the 48 contiguous states in the United States, or yogurt, soft fresh cheese (fromage frais), uncreamed, creamed, or partially creamed cottage cheese, sour cream, sour half-and-half, or light sour cream which is sold for use outside the boundaries of the United States, or any product for which no definition and standards are prescribed in Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501), except the products defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 61932. 

(b) Class 4b comprises all market milk, market skim milk, or market cream used in the manufacture of cheese other than cottage cheese.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 242, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

61936.

If the director establishes a temporary definition and standards for any new milk product pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 36631), Chapter 1, Part 3 of Division 15, he shall assign such new product to that class under this article which includes the most nearly comparable product as determined by the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61937.

Market milk, market skim milk, or market cream, utilized in bulk by handlers as condensed milk, condensed skim milk, evaporated skim milk, evaporated cream or clotted cream, or evaporated milk, shall be assigned by the director to the classification of ultimate usage of such market milk, market skim milk, or market cream.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Marketing Areas [61961. - 61963.]

61961.

The director shall designate marketing areas which he deems necessary or advisable to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, and in which he finds the conditions affecting the production, handling, and sale of market milk, are reasonably uniform.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61962.

The director may establish additional areas, or modify areas previously established, if he deems the establishment or modification of such areas necessary or advisble to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61963.

If the director finds, after a public hearing in and for each particular marketing area under consideration for consolidation, that conditions of production and handling are reasonably uniform in two or more such marketing areas in which stabilization and marketing plans are in effect, he may consolidate the areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Formation and Adoption of Stabilization and Marketing Plans [61991. - 61998.]

61991.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 61992, the director shall, prior to the formulation of a stabilization and marketing plan for market milk for any marketing area, conduct a public hearing in the area for the purpose of determining whether or not the formulation of a stabilization and marketing plan for market milk for such area is desired by producers whose major interest in the market milk business is in the production of market milk for the marketing area and that both:

(a) Represent not less than 65 percent of the total number of producers whose major interest in the market milk business is in the production of market milk for the marketing area.

(b) Produce not less than 65 percent of the total volume of the market milk produced for the marketing area by all such producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61992.

A hearing need not, however, be held if a petition requesting a stabilization and marketing plan is presented to the director by the producers whose major interest in the market milk business is in the production of market milk for the marketing area, and that both:

(a) Represent not less than 65 percent of the total number of producers whose major interest in the market milk business is in the production of market milk for the marketing area.

(b) Produce not less than 65 percent of the total volume of the market milk produced for the marketing area by all such producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61993.

If the director finds that a stablization and marketing plan is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, he shall formulate a stabilization and marketing plan for market milk for such area and issue a notice of public hearing upon the plan which is formulated to all producers and handlers of record with the department that may be subject to the provisions of such plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61994.

The notice of the hearing may be effected by mail, or by publication pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in the area which is designated. It shall specify the time and place of such hearing, which shall not be prior to 15 days from the mailing, or from the final publication of such notice. If no daily newspaper of general circulation is published in the area which is designated, publication pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code shall be considered proper publication of notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61995.

At the hearing, interested parties shall be heard and records kept of the proceedings of such hearing for determination by the director whether the plan proposed will accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61996.

If, after the public hearing, the director determines that the proposed plan will tend to accomplish the purposes of this chapter within the standards which are prescribed in it, he or she shall issue an order to all producers and handlers of record with the department and subject to the provisions of the plan, declaring the plan in effect within 62 days from the date of the hearing. The director shall announce any order under this section at least 10 calendar days prior to the effective date of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 261, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

61997.

A handler that is subject to the provisions of any stabilization and marketing plan shall not purchase milk from any producer that does not comply with this chapter and such plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61998.

No stabilization or marketing plan shall contain provisions the purposes of which are to establish limitations upon the production of market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Amendment and Termination of Stabilization and Marketing Plans [62031. - 62032.]

62031.

The director may amend or terminate any stabilization and marketing plan, after notice and public hearing as prescribed in Article 7 (commencing with Section 61991), if he or she finds that the plan is no longer in conformity with the standards which are prescribed in, or will not tend to effectuate the purposes of, this chapter. Any order under this article amending or terminating any stabilization and marketing plan shall be subject to Section 61996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

62032.

A hearing on the amendment or termination of a stabilization and marketing plan may be held upon the motion of the director and shall be held upon receipt of a petition which is signed by producers, or by the board of directors of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association which is authorized by its members to so petition. Such petition shall represent not less than 55 percent of the total number of all producers and not less than 55 percent of the total production of all producers that are eligible to petition the director for the formulation of such a plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Establishment of Minimum Prices and Provisions of Stabilization and Marketing Plans [62061. - 62079.]

62061.

Each stabilization and marketing plan shall contain provisions for prohibiting producers and handlers from engaging in the unlawful trade practices applicable to them that are set forth in Article 10 (commencing with Section 62091) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62062.

Each stabilization and marketing plan shall contain provisions whereby the director establishes minimum prices to be paid by handlers to producers for market milk in the various classes. The director shall establish the prices by designating them in the plan, or by adopting methods or formulas in the plan whereby the prices can be determined, or any combination of the foregoing. If the director directly designates prices in the plan, the prices shall be in reasonable and sound economic relationship with the national value of manufactured milk products. If the director adopts methods or formulas in the plan for designation of prices, the methods or formulas shall be reasonably calculated to result in prices that are in a reasonable and sound economic relationship with the national value of manufactured milk products.

In establishing the prices, the director shall take into consideration any relevant economic factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The reasonableness and economic soundness of market milk prices for all classes, giving consideration to the combined income from those class prices, in relation to the cost of producing and marketing market milk for all purposes, including manufacturing purposes. In determining the costs, the director shall consider the cost of management and a reasonable return on necessary capital investment.

(b) That prices established pursuant to this section shall insure an adequate and continuous supply, in relation to demand, of pure, fresh, wholesome market milk for all purposes, including manufacturing purposes, at prices to consumers which, when considered with relevant economic criteria, are fair and reasonable. 

(c) That prices, including the prices of components of milk, established by the director for the various classes of market milk bear a reasonable and sound economic relationship to each other.

In establishing the prices, the director shall also take into consideration all the purposes, policies, and standards contained in Sections 61801, 61802, 61805, 61806, 61807, 62076, and 62077.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1112, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

62062.1.

Any designation of a class 1 price by any method or formula that is used to develop class 1 prices paid to producers in the various marketing areas, shall provide, on a calendar year basis, a statewide weighted average minimum price level for a hundred weight of milk testing 3.5 fat and 8.7 solids not fat that is in reasonable relationship with minimum class 1 milk prices paid to producers in contiguous states. If the statewide weighted average class 1 prices paid to producers are not in a reasonable relationship with the class 1 prices paid to producers in contiguous states, the secretary shall immediately hold a hearing to consider adjustments to the class 1 prices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

62062.5.

The minimum prices otherwise established pursuant to this chapter shall be increased by any security charges that are imposed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 62500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 24.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62063.

Subject to the provisions of Sections 62074 and 62075, each stabilization and marketing plan shall contain provisions whereby the director shall provide methods for the establishment of minimum prices for market milk received within a marketing area regardless of whether the milk is subsequently sold or distributed within or without the marketing area within the jurisdiction of this state, and may contain the provisions whether or not the market milk is subsequently sold or distributed outside the jurisdiction of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.   Effective July 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

62064.

Each stabilization and marketing plan shall provide all of the following:

(a) For the establishment of prices for market milk, whether or not such market milk is subsequently sold or distributed in another marketing area within this state where a stabilization and marketing plan is in effect.

(b) That, if area of usage pricing is in effect, producers shall be paid not less than the minimum prices established for the marketing area wherein such market milk is ultimately sold or distributed.

(c) That, if area of usage pricing is in effect and such market milk is subsequently sold or distributed in any place within the jurisdiction of this state where no stabilization and marketing plan is in effect, such market milk shall be paid by the handler to the producer at not less than the average of prices which are paid by handlers, whose plants are located within such area, to producers for market milk. If, however, no plants are located within such area, the price which shall be paid by the handler to the producer shall not be less than the average of prices which are paid by handlers to producers for market milk, at the plants in the nearest marketing areas adjacent to the area where such market milk is sold or distributed, as established by the stabilization and marketing plans in effect in such adjacent marketing areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62065.

No amendment of this article terminates or invalidates any provision of any stabilization and marketing plan which has been established by the director prior to the effective date of such amendment. Each such plan shall, however, be brought into conformity with such amendment at the earliest practicable date after the effective date of such amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62066.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the director, in establishing minimum prices to be paid by handlers to producers, for market milk in any marketing area, may establish, as the applicable minimum prices, those prices applicable within the marketing area of ultimate usage of such market milk, those prices applicable within the marketing area where the plant of first receipt of such market milk is located, those prices applicable in the marketing area where the producers place of production is located, or any of the above or any combination of the above.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62067.

Each stabilization and marketing plan may contain provisions which require handlers to report to each producer from whom market milk is secured all of the following:

(a) The volume of market milk received from such producer in pounds of milk. 

(b) The milk fat, solids-not-fat, or other component tests of such milk.

(c) The amount of market milk in pounds of milk fat, solids-not-fat or other components paid for in the several classes or pools.

(d) The prices paid for the various classes for each month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62068.

Each stabilization and marketing plan may contain provisions which authorize any handler that purchases market milk under contract from any producer to pool such market milk for producer payment purposes in accordance with such contracts, irrespective of whether such market milk is actually and physically received at the same milk products plant or diverted, in accordance with such plan. Such provisions may do any of the following:

(a) Provide that market milk that is received from producers by milk products plants under the same ownership, may be pooled for purposes of payment to producers.

(b) Provide that if a handler pools market milk, as provided in subdivision (a), the handler shall allocate, among all producers that participate in the class 1 usage, transportation savings which are applicable to market milk, not actually transported between the plant of first receipt and one or more other plants subject to the pool, and used for class 1, and may pay to producers shipping market milk directly to a plant subject to the pool a price for usage of such market milk for class 1, which price represents the average of minimum producer prices payable by that particular plant for such class 1 usage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62069.

The director may establish minimum prices to be paid by handlers to producer-handlers for milk not used by the purchasing handler as class 1 milk. These provisions may provide that the milk, if used in classes other than class 1 by the purchasing handler, may be paid for at the minimum prices established by the director for this other usage but which shall not be less than the prices as found by the director to be paid by manufacturing milk plants in, or adjacent to, the area that use milk for similar purposes. The prices shall remain in effect only for the period during which, as determined by the director, there is a surplus of producer-handler milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

62070.

Each stabilization and marketing plan may further provide for maximum charges for plant processing and transportation service on the market milk or market milk components which are transported to the area where sold. The stabilization and marketing plan may enumerate the applicable maximum charges, and may establish individual charges for each function enumerated. In establishing any such maximum charges for such transportation services, the director shall base such maximum charges upon the rates which are charged for actual or reasonably similar services by highway carriers, as the term “highway carriers” is defined in Secton 3511 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62071.

Each stabilization and marketing plan may provide for minimum charges for the various services performed or rendered by a nonprofit cooperative association in respect to class 1 market milk sold or delivered to another handler. Handler services include component testing for payment purposes, quality control, producer payroll, weighing and sampling of bulk market milk. Each stablization and marketing plan may also include, but not be limited to, minimum charges for the handling of intermittent or irregular deliveries of market milk and plant standby services. The stabilization and marketing plan may enumerate applicable minimum charges and establish individual charges for each service enumerated or, in the alternative, the director may establish one or more minimum charges covering one or more of the separate handler services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62072.

In establishing minimum handler service charges under Section 62071, the director shall take into consideration all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The reasonably necessary costs of providing such services, including overhead, as determined by impartial cost surveys, examination of books and records, or both, of such portions of those handlers within the marketing area as are reasonably determined by the director to be sufficiently representative to indicate such costs of all reasonably efficient handlers within such marketing area.

(b) The relationship of the establishment of such minimum charges to the achievement and maintenance of the orderly marketing of market milk and to the effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62073.

If any contract between a handler and a producer for the purchase of any market milk provides that the charges for the hauling of it shall be paid, in whole or in part, by the producer, and such hauling is done by the handler either directly or through an agent or by any person that contracts with, or is designated by, such handler for such hauling, the director may, and upon the written request of the producer or the written request of any association representing the producer shall, investigate the rates, terms, and conditions which are involved in such hauling in order to determine whether such rates, terms and conditions are in compliance with Section 62070.

If the director determines that such rates, terms, and conditions are not in compliance with Section 62070, he shall determine, within the standards which are prescribed in Section 62070, the maximum charges on account of such hauling that will comply with Section 62070 with respect to such purchase of market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62074.

If the director establishes a stabilization and marketing plan for market milk, the director shall establish minimum prices to be paid by handlers for market cream, market skim milk, or milk fat, or market skim milk components of such market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62074.5.

A stabilization and marketing plan may contain provisions necessary to encourage the availability of market milk for those usages for which class 1 and class 2 milk is mandatory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

62075.

The director shall establish the minimum prices to be paid by handlers to producers for class I usage of market milk upon a milk fat, solids-not-fat or the subcomponents thereof, and fluid carrier basis. In establishing the minimum prices for classes of market milk other than class I, separate prices may be established for any one or more of the following:

(a) The milk fat contained in such milk.

(b) The solids-not-fat or subcomponents thereof contained in such milk.

(c) The fluid contained in such milk.

(d) Any combination of the milk fat, the solids-not-fat or subcomponents thereof, or the fluid contained in such milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62076.

In establishing prices to be paid by handlers to producers for class 2, class 3, class 4a, or class 4b market milk, the director shall take into consideration any relevant economic factors, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The relative market value of the various products yielded from such market milk.

(b) The market price of other milk which may be used for the same purposes that are set forth in such respective classes.

(c) The value of milk used for manufacturing purposes giving consideration to any relevant factors including, but not limited to, product prices, product yields, and manufacturing costs of class 4a or class 4b.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 132, Sec. 38.   Effective March 25, 1982.   Operative July 23, 1982, by Sec. 40 of Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

62077.

A handler shall not pay any producer less than the applicable price established for the usage to which the market milk, purchased from him is applied pursuant to accounting procedures established by the director. If the market milk is not applied to any purpose set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 61931), then a handler shall not pay any producer less than the lower of the prices established under the applicable stabilization and marketing plan for class 4a and class 4b usage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 132, Sec. 39.   Effective March 25, 1982.   Operative July 23, 1982, by Sec. 40 of Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

62078.

All handlers who receive market milk within this state shall be obligated to pay minimum producer prices established under this chapter regardless of the area of origin of such milk, whether inside or outside the jurisdiction of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62079.

Whenever a pooling plan is in effect as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 62750) of this part, all market milk received by pool handlers shall be obligated to the pool at the applicable minimum price established in the Stabilization and Marketing Plans based on the classified usage of that milk. Handlers may pay producers for restricted use market milk at prices that are less than the amount credited to those handlers for restricted use market milk by the pooling plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Unlawful Trade Practices [62091. - 62095.]

62091.

The unlawful trade practices described in this article apply to every handler whether or not a stabilization and marketing plan is in effect in the area in which the handler is licensed or carries on his business. This article applies to transactions conducted, either directly or indirectly, between producers and handlers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62092.

The payment, allowance, or acceptance of any secret rebate, secret refund, or unearned discount by any person, whether in the form of money or otherwise, is an unlawful trade practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62093.

The giving of any milk, cream, dairy product, service, or article of any kind, except to a bona fide charity, for the purpose of securing or retaining the market milk business of any customer is an unlawful trade practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62094.

The payment, gift, or the offer or promise of any payment or gift, of money or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, or through any agent or other intermediary, to any person with the purpose or design of inducing such person to become or remain the wholesale customer of any handler is an unlawful trade practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62095.

The payment, gift, or the offer or promise of any payment or gift, of money or other thing of value by any person, directly or indirectly or through any agent or other intermediary, to any handler or producer, or the acceptance by any handler or producer of the payment or gift or thing of value is an unlawful trade practice if it is for any of the following:

(a) For the purpose of inducing a handler or producer to enter into a new contract, or to renew, extend, or modify an existing contract, for the purchase of market milk by a handler from a producer.

(b) As a condition upon which a handler will enter into a new contract, or renew, extend, or modify an existing contract, for the purchase of market milk from a producer.

(c) For the purpose of enabling a handler to pay to a producer, or a producer to receive from a handler, less than the minimum class usage prices established by the director to be paid by handlers to producers for market milk.

(d) Nothing in this section prevents a handler from paying to a producer, or a producer from receiving from a handler, prices in excess of the minimum prices established by the director if these prices are paid to all producers supplying the handler under the same terms and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 25.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Sales to the United States [62121. - 62121.]

62121.

The director may require that each person that submits a bid for the sale to an agency of the United States government of market milk or any milk product which utilizes class 1 market milk shall file with the director, at the same time such bid is submitted, a complete copy of such bid and the following certification:

“The undersigned certifies that in sales by the undersigned to agencies of the United States Government, pursuant to the attached bid, for market milk or milk products utilizing class 1 market milk, as such class 1 market milk is defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801), Part 3, Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, the undersigned is complying with all California statutes and regulations pertaining to the establishment and enforcement by the Director of Food and Agriculture of minimum prices to be paid producers for such class 1 market milk.”

All bids and certifications filed pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall not be divulged except when necessary for the proper determination of any court proceeding or hearing before the director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Handlers’ Licenses [62141. - 62155.]

62141.

The licenses provided for in this article are required for each handler. For the purposes of this article, each subsidiary milk plant or branch milk plant, whether under one ownership or not, shall be considered as an individual handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62142.

For the purposes of this article, “handler” shall include any person defined as a handler under Section 61826 or any person defined as a distributor under Section 61306 that purchases or handles market milk or market cream for processing, manufacture, or sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62143.

No person who qualifies as a handler under Section 62142 shall deal in market milk without first obtaining a license from the director. In addition, any person qualifying as a handler who purchases or handles market milk or market cream for processing or manufacture shall obtain a license for each milk plant owned or operated. The license provided for in this article is in addition to any license which is required by Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501), or by any law or ordinance of any county or municipality of this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 61832, “milk plant” as used in this article, means any place, structure, or building where a handler receives market milk and weighs, tests, standardizes, pasteurizes, homogenizes, separates, bottles or packages such milk. “Milk plant” does not include a place, structure, or building which is used for the purpose of receiving, weighing, or testing milk to be diverted or delivered to a licensed milk plant of the handler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

62144.

Applications for the license provided by this article shall be made on forms prescribed by the director, accompanied by a fee as prescribed in Section 62145, and state the name and address of the applicant and any details specifically related to the nature of the applicant’s business that the director may require. The applicant shall further satisfy the director of his or her character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business stated in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

62145.

One-half of the valid license renewals shall be issued for a period of 24 months beginning January 1, 1988. The application fee for renewal of the 24-month license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

The remaining valid license renewals shall be issued for a period of 12 months beginning January 1, 1988. The application fee for the renewal of the 12-month license shall be twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50).

Beginning January 1, 1989, all renewals of licenses shall be issued for a 24-month period and shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

Except as otherwise provided, beginning January 1, 1988, every new license issued shall expire on the 31st day of December of the following year.

Application for a new license or a renewal license, together with the appropriate application fee, shall be made prior to the handling of market milk or the expiration date of the license held. If it is not so made, the applicant shall pay an additional twenty-five dollars ($25) before the license shall be issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 534, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

62146.

The director may refuse to grant or renew any license if he or she is satisfied that any applicant, or any person connected with the applicant, either directly or indirectly, has violated any of the following:

(a) This chapter or any stabilization and marketing plan or other regulation adopted under this chapter.

(b) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301).

(c) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) or any pooling plan established thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 32.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62147.

The director may also refuse to grant or renew any license to a handler if he is satisfied that the handler has failed to pay for any market milk delivered to him at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62148.

The proceedings to determine whether or not the director shall refuse to grant or renew a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all of the powers granted in such chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62149.

The decision may include an order refusing to grant or renew the license applied for, or affixing other conditional and probationary orders that may be proper for the enforcement of any of the following:

(a) This chapter or any stabilization and marketing plan formulated pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301).

(c) Any regulation duly adopted by the director pursuant to Section 61891.

(d) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) or any pooling plan established thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 33.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62150.

After any decision in favor of the issuance or renewal of a license which includes any conditional or probationary orders, if the person to whom the license is issued does not comply with any such orders, the director may suspend or revoke the license in accordance with the procedure provided in Sections 62151, 62152, 62153, 62154, and 62155.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62151.

The director may revoke or suspend, as the case may require, any license which is issued pursuant to this chapter, if he or she is satisfied that any licensee or any person who is connected with the licensee has violated any of the following:

(a) This chapter or any stabilization and marketing plan which is formulated pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any regulation which is adopted by the director pursuant to Section 61891. 

(c) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301).

(d) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) or any pooling plan adopted thereunder.

The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers which are granted in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 34.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62152.

The director may also revoke or suspend any license of a handler if he is satisfied that the handler has not paid for any market milk delivered to him at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the producer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

62153.
